Nebraska, session 109, LB570.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB570 LB570
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) The Department of Health and Human Services shall
award scholarships of two thousand five hundred dollars per semester to
nursing students who meet the qualifications listed in subsection (2) of
this section subject to available appropriations.
(2) To be eligible for a scholarship, a nursing student shall:
(a) Reside in Nebraska;
(b) Enroll or state an intent to enroll in a nursing program that
(i) is approved pursuant to sections 38-2232 to 38-2236, (ii) is offered
by a public or private postsecondary institution in Nebraska, and (iii)
consists of courses of instruction in regularly scheduled classes leading
only to an associate degree, diploma, or certificate in nursing or an
accelerated bachelor of science in nursing degree;
(c) State an intent to practice as a licensed practical nurse,
licensed registered nurse, or nurse aide upon completion of the approved
nursing program; and
(d) Agree in writing to work for two years in this state as a
licensed practical nurse, licensed registered nurse, or nurse aide upon
completion of the approved nursing program.
(3) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate five million
dollars for fiscal year 2025-26 to the Department of Health and Human
Services for purposes of this section.
-2-